utilities/dictionaries/ltg_LTG-Latgalian.dic
aizčeikstēt/ILN470-
aizdrebēt/ILN470-
aizdzirdeit/ILN470-
aizgribēt/ILN470-
aizlaksteit/ILN470-
aizluopeit/ILN470-
aizmeideit/ILN470-
aizpraseit/ILN470-
aizsaceit/ILN470-
aizskanēt/ILN470-
aizslauceit/ILN470-
aizstuovēt/ILN470-
aizsvaideit/ILN470-
aizturēt/ILN470-
apadeit/ILN470-
apbuorsteit/ILN470-
apdareit/ILN470-
apganeit/ILN470-
apgrūzeit/ILN470-
apguļdeit/ILN470-
apkrateit/ILN470-
aplaksteit/ILN470-
aplauzeit/ILN470-
apmaidzeit/ILN470-
apmaiseit/ILN470-
apruodeit/ILN470-
apsiļdeit/ILN470-
apslauceit/ILN470-
apspardeit/ILN470-
apstuovēt/ILN470-
apškaļdeit/ILN470-
apturēt/ILN470-
atadeit/ILN470-
atbrauceit/ILN470-
atdareit/ILN470-
atdunēt/ILN470-
atganeit/ILN470-
atgraizeit/ILN470-
atgulēt/ILN470-
atklauseit/ILN470-
atlaisteit/ILN470-
atlauzeit/ILN470-
atmaiseit/ILN470-
atminēt/ILN470-
atpraseit/ILN470-
atruodeit/ILN470-
atsaudeit/ILN470-
atsiļdeit/ILN470-
atskaiteit/ILN470-
atskraideit/ILN470-
atsmaļsteit/ILN470-
atstateit/ILN470-
atsuopēt/ILN470-
atškaļdeit/ILN470-
atturēt/ILN470-
atvaidēt/ILN470-
dačeikstēt/ILN470-
daganeit/ILN470-
dagrūzeit/ILN470-
daguļdeit/ILN470-
dakrateit/ILN470-
daluopeit/ILN470-
damaiseit/ILN470-
dapraseit/ILN470-
daruodeit/ILN470-
dasaudeit/ILN470-
dasiļdeit/ILN470-
daskaiteit/ILN470-
daskraideit/ILN470-
daspardeit/ILN470-
dastuovēt/ILN470-
dataiseit/ILN470-
daturēt/ILN470-
davaidēt/ILN470-
izbadeit/ILN470-
izbuorsteit/ILN470-
izdaleit/ILN470-
izdunēt/ILN470-
izganeit/ILN470-
izgrūzeit/ILN470-
izguļdeit/ILN470-
izkrateit/ILN470-
izlaksteit/ILN470-
izleidzēt/ILN470-
izmaidzeit/ILN470-
izmaiseit/ILN470-
izplateit/ILN47-
izraksteit/ILN47-
izsaceit/ILN470-
izsēdēt/ILN470-
izsyuteit/ILN470-
izskanēt/ILN470-
izslauceit/ILN470-
izstateit/ILN470-
izsuopēt/ILN470-
izškaļdeit/ILN470-
izturēt/ILN470-
izvadeit/ILN470-
ībadeit/ILN470-
īčabēt/ILN470-
īdaleit/ILN470-
īdrebēt/ILN470-
īdzirdeit/ILN470-
īgraizeit/ILN470-
īgrūzeit/ILN470-
īguļdeit/ILN470-
īklauseit/ILN470-
īlaisteit/ILN470-
īlauzeit/ILN470-
īmaidzeit/ILN470-
īmaiseit/ILN470-
īminēt/ILN470-
īpraseit/ILN470-
īredzēt/ILN470-
īsaceit/ILN470-
īsiļdeit/ILN470-
īskaiteit/ILN470-
īskraideit/ILN470-
īspardeit/ILN470-
īstuovēt/ILN470-
īsvaideit/ILN470-
ītaiseit/ILN470-
īvadeit/ILN470-
nūadeit/ILN470-
nūbrauceit/ILN470-
nūčabēt/ILN470-
nūdaleit/ILN470-
nūdunēt/ILN470-
nūganeit/ILN470-
nūgraizeit/ILN470-
nūgrūzeit/ILN470-
nūguļdeit/ILN470-
nūkrateit/ILN470-
nūlaupeit/ILN470-
nūluodēt/ILN470-
nūmaidzeit/ILN470-
nūmaiseit/ILN470-
nūplateit/ILN47-
nūraksteit/ILN47-
nūsaudeit/ILN470-
nūsyuteit/ILN470-
nūskanēt/ILN470-
nūsmaļsteit/ILN470-
nūstuovēt/ILN470-
nūtaiseit/ILN470-
nūturēt/ILN470-
nūvadeit/ILN470-
ņudareit/ILN470-
paadeit/ILN470-
pabrauceit/ILN470-
pačabēt/ILN470-
padaleit/ILN470-
padrebēt/ILN470-
padzirdeit/ILN470-
paganeit/ILN470-
pagraizeit/ILN470-
pagulēt/ILN470-
pakaiseit/ILN470-
pakrateit/ILN470-
palaksteit/ILN470-
paleidzēt/ILN470-
pamaidzeit/ILN470-
pamaiseit/ILN470-
paminēt/ILN470-
paplateit/ILN47-
paraksteit/ILN47-
pasaceit/ILN470-
pasiļdeit/ILN470-
paskaiteit/ILN470-
paskraideit/ILN470-
pasmaļsteit/ILN470-
pastateit/ILN470-
pasuopēt/ILN470-
paškaļdeit/ILN470-
patupēt/ILN470-
pauordeit/ILN470-
pavaidēt/ILN470-
pībrauceit/ILN470-
pīčeikstēt/ILN470-
pīdzirdeit/ILN470-
pīgraizeit/ILN470-
pīguļdeit/ILN470-
pīkrateit/ILN470-
pīlaksteit/ILN470-
pīlauzeit/ILN470-
pīmaidzeit/ILN470-
pīmaiseit/ILN470-
pīpraseit/ILN470-
pīsaceit/ILN470-
pīsēdēt/ILN470-
pīsyuteit/ILN470-
pīslauceit/ILN470-
pīstateit/ILN470-
pīsvaideit/ILN470-
pītaiseit/ILN470-
pīuordeit/ILN470-
pīvaidēt/ILN470-
puoradeit/ILN470-
puordaleit/ILN470-
puordzirdeit/ILN470-
puorgrūzeit/ILN470-
puorkrateit/ILN470-
puorluodēt/ILN470-
puormaiseit/ILN470-
puorredzēt/ILN470-
puorsiļdeit/ILN470-
puorslauceit/ILN470-
puorsuopēt/ILN470-
puortupēt/ILN470-
sabadeit/ILN470-
sadaleit/ILN470-
sadzirdeit/ILN470-
sagribēt/ILN470-
sakaiseit/ILN470-
salaksteit/ILN470-
saluopeit/ILN470-
sameideit/ILN470-
saredzēt/ILN470-
sasiļdeit/ILN470-
saskraideit/ILN470-
sastateit/ILN470-
saškaļdeit/ILN470-
savadeit/ILN470-
